New Jersey, session 221, A3095.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Receipts from the sale of a passenger automobile to a veteran who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States with a service-connected disability shall be exempt from the tax imposed pursuant to the Sales and Use Tax Act, P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.). b.    As used in this section: Passenger automobile means any automobile used and designed for the transportation of passengers, other than omnibuses and school buses. Service-connected disability means a disability sustained by injury or illness that was incurred or aggravated during military service as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to receipts from sales made on or after the first day of the second month next following the date of enactment.